scrapedcsv2yaml/yaml_output/VTI_oo.yaml
     aatawebidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: niyaatawebidoon
     aatawebidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odaatawebidoon
     aatawebidoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: aatawebidood
     aatawebidoon+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: ayaatawebidood
     aatebidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indaatebidoon
     aatebidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindaatebidoon
     aatebidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nidaatebidoon
     aatebidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odaatebidoon
     aatebidoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: aatebidood
     aatebidoon+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: ayaatebidood
     aatebidoon+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: aatebidoon 
     aatwaakosidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indaatwaakosidoon
     aatwaakosidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindaatwaakosidoon
     aatwaakosidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: ndaatwaakosidoon
     aatwaakosidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odaatwaakosidoon
     aatwaakosidoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: aatwaakosidood
     aatwaakosidoon+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: ayaatwaakosidood
     aatwaakosidoon+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: aatwaakosidoon
     aawada'oodoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: niyaawada'oodoon
     aawada'oodoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odaawada'oodoon
     aawada'oodoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: aawada'oodood
     aawada'oodoon+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: ayaawada'oodood
     aawada'oodoon+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: aawada'oodoon
     aawadoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indaawadoon
     aawadoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: ndaawadoon
     aawadoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: niyaawadoon
     aawadoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odaawadoon
     aawadoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: aawadood
     aawadoon+VTI+Particip+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: ayaawadood
     aawadoon+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: aawadoon
     aazhawa'oodoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indaazhawa'oodoon
     aazhawa'oodoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindaazhawa'oodoon
     aazhawa'oodoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nidaazhawa'oodoon
     aazhawa'oodoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: niyaazhawa'oodoon
     aazhawa'oodoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odaazhawa'oodoon
     aazhawa'oodoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: oyaazhawa'oodoon
     aazhawa'oodoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: aazhawa'oodood
     aazhawa'oodoon+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: ayaazhawa'oodood
     aazhawa'oodoon+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: aazhawa'oodoon 
     aazhawapidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: niyaazhawapidoon
     aazhawapidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindaazhawapidoon
     aazhawapidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: oyaazhawapidoon 
     aazhawapidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odaazhawapidoon
     aazhawapidoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: aazhawapidood
     aazhawapidoon+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: aazhawapidoon
     aazhawaakogoodoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindaazhawaakogoodoon
     aazhawaakogoodoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odaazhawaakogoodoon
     aazhawaakogoodoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: aazhawaakogoodood
     aazhawaakogoodoon+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: aazhawaakogoodoon
     aazhawaakosidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: ndaazhawaakosidoon
     aazhawaakosidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: niyaazhawaakosidoon 
     aazhawaakosidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindaazhawaakosidoon
     aazhawaakosidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nidaazhawaakosidoon
     aazhawaakosidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odaazhawaakosidoon
     aazhawaakosidoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: aazhawaakosidood
     aazhawaakosidoon+VTI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: ayaazhawaakosidood
     aazhawaakosidoon+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: aazhawaakosidoon
     aazhawewesidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindaazhawewesidoon
     aazhawewesidoon+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odaazhawewewesidoon
     aazhawewesidoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: aazhawewewesidood
     aazhawewesidoon+VTI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: aazhawewewesidoon
